test/src/morphology/V-nulcj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - нулць: # Verb 'to shout' - partial paradigm
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: нулъювˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: нулъян
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: нулйˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: нулъяниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: нулъядиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: нулъяхаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: нулъянаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: нулъядаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: нулъядˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg1: нулъюваць
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg2: нулъянась
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg3: нулъяць
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu1: нулъянинзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu2: нулъядинзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu3: нулъяханзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl1: нулъянаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl2: нулъядаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl3: нулъядаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Hort+RcSg1: нулкавˮ  
     нулць+V+Refl+Hort+RcDu1: нулканиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Hort+RcPl1: нулканаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Imprt+RcSg2: [нулдˮ, нулдаˮма]
     нулць+V+Refl+Imprt+RcDu2: нулдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Imprt+RcPl2: нулдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Opt+RcSg3: нуламдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Opt+RcDu3: нулхамдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Opt+RcPl3: нулдамдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg1: нулъивˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg2: нулъин
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg3: нулъиˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu1: нулъиниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu2: нулъидиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu3: нулъихаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl1: нулъинаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl2: нулъидаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl3: нулъидˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg1: нулъиваць
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg2: нулъинась
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg3: нулъиць
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu1: нулъининзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu2: нулъидинзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu3: нулъиханзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl1: нулъинаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl2: нулъидаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl3: нулъидаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg1: нулцувˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg2: нулцун
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg3: нулцуˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu1: нулцуниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu2: нулцудиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu3: нулцухуʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl1: нулцунаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl2: нулцудаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl3: нулцудˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg1: нулцявˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcSg1: нулцивˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg2: нулцян
     нулць+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcSg2: нулцин
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg3: нулцяˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcSg3: нулциˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu1: нулцяниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcDu1: нулциниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu2: нулцядиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcDu2: нулцидиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu3: нулцяхаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcDu3: нулцихаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl1: нулцянаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcPl1: нулцинаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl2: нулцядаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcPl2: нулцидаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl3: нулцядˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcPl3: нулцидˮ   
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg1: нулмэвˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg2: нулмэн
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg3: нулмыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu1: нулмэниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu2: нулмэдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu3: нулмэхэʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl1: нулмэнаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl2: нулмэдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl3: нулмыдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg1: нулмэваць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg2: нулмэнась
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg3: нулмыць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu1: нулмэнинзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu2: нулмэдинзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu3: нулмэханзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl1: нулмэнаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl2: нулмэдаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl3: нулмыдаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg1: нултакэвˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg2: нултакэн
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg3: нултакыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu1: нултакэниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu2: нултакэдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu3: нултакэхэʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl1: нултакэнаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl2: нултакэдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl3: нултакыдˮ 
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg1: нултакэваць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg2: нултакэнась
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg3: нултакыць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu1: нултакэнинзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu2: нултакэдинзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu3: нултакэхэнзь
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl1: нултакэнаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl2: нултакэдаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl3: нултакыдаць
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg1: нулмэкэвˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg2: нулмэкэн
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg3: нулмэкыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu1: нулмэкэниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu2: нулмэкэдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu3: нулмэкэхэʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl1: нулмэкэнаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl2: нулмэкэдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl3: нулмэкыдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg1: нулцакэвˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg2: нулцакэн
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg3: нулцакыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu1: нулцакэниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu2: нулцакэдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu3: нулцакэхэʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl1: нулцакэнаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl2: нулцакэдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl3: нулцакыдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcSg1: нултарыхывˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcSg2: нултарыхын
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcSg3: нултарыхыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcDu1: нултарыхыниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcDu2: нултарыхыдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcDu3: нултарыхыхаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcPl1: нултарыхынаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcPl2: нултарыхыдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcPl3: нултарыхыдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg1: нулмэрыхывˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg2: нулмэрыхын
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg3: нулмэрыхыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu1: нулмэрыхыниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu2: нулмэрыхыдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu3: нулмэрыхыхаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl1: нулмэрыхынаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl2: нулмэрыхыдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl3: нулмэрыхыдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg1: нулмандархывˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg2: нулмандархын
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg3: нулмандархыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu1: нулмандархыниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu2: нулмандархыдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu3: нулмандархыхаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl1: нулмандархынаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl2: нулмандархыдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl3: нулмандархыдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg1: нулманӈгабивˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg2: нулманӈгабин
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg3: нулманӈгабиˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu1: нулманӈгабиниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu2: нулманӈгабидиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu3: нулманӈгабихаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl1: нулманӈгабинаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl2: нулманӈгабидаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl3: нулманӈгабидˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg1: нулхавэвˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg2: нулхавэн
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg3: нулхавыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu1: нулхавэниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu2: нулхавэдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu3: нулхавэхэʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl1: нулхавэнаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl2: нулхавэдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl3: нулхавыдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg1: нулмнавˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg2: нулмнан
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg3: нулманˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu1: нулмнаниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu2: нулмнадиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu3: нулмнахаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl1: нулмнанаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl2: нулмнадаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl3: нулмнадˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg1: нулбивˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg2: нулбин
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg3: нулбиˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu1: нулбиниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu2: нулбидиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu3: нулбихаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl1: нулбинаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl2: нулбидаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl3: нулбидˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+InfImprf: нулма  
     нулць+V+Refl+InfPrf: нулоˮма  
     нулць+V+Refl+PrcImprf: нулта
     нулць+V+Refl+PrcPrf: нулмы
     нулць+V+Refl+PrcFut: нулманда   
     нулць+V+Refl+PrcNeg: нулмдавэй
     нулць+V+Refl+Ger: нулць
     нулць+V+Refl+GerFin: нулманзь      
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord: нулпˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Aud: [нулмоʼ, нулманоʼ]
     нулць+V+Refl+Evas: нулмоӈгад
     нулць+V+Refl+ConNeg: нулˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+ConNeg: нултыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg1: [нулпнани, нулпаˮни]
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg2: [нулпнанд, нулпат]
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg3: [нулпнанда, нулпата, нулпатавʼ] 
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu1: [нулпнаниʼ, нулпаˮниʼ]
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu2: [нулпнандиʼ, нулпаˮтиʼ]
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu3: [нулпнандиʼ, нулпаˮтиʼ]
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl1: [нулпнанаˮ, нулпаˮнаˮ]
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl2: [нулпнандаˮ, нулпатаˮ]
     нулць+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl3: [нулпнандоʼ, нулпатоʼ]
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: нултывˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: нултын
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: нултыˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: нултыниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: нултыдиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: нултыхыʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: нултынаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: нултыдаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: нултыдˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Hab+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: нулъювˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Hab+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: нулъян
     нулць+V+Refl+Hab+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: нулйˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Hab+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: нулъяниʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Hab+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: нулъядиʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Hab+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: нулъяхаʼ
     нулць+V+Refl+Hab+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: нулъянаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Hab+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: нулъядаˮ
     нулць+V+Refl+Hab+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: нулъядˮ
